District of Columbia statutes.
3-2508

Repealed

Penalty; prosecutions.

Repealed.

June 18, 1898, 30 Stat. 477, ch. 467, § 8
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 474, 32 DCR 4450
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1237, 46 DCR 3142
1973 Ed., § 2-1408.
1981 Ed., § 2-2108.